apertium-ga-gv.ga.dix
    <pardef n="teasa/irg__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rgfar</l>
          <r>irg<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rgfaidh</l>
          <r>irg<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rgfaimid</l>
          <r>irg<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rgfaidh</l>
          <r>irg<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rgfaidh</l>
          <r>irg<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rgfaidh</l>
          <r>irg<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rgfaidh</l>
          <r>irg<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rgfaí</l>
          <r>irg<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rgfainn</l>
          <r>irg<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rgfaimis</l>
          <r>irg<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rgfá</l>
          <r>irg<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rgfadh</l>
          <r>irg<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rgfadh</l>
          <r>irg<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rgfaidís</l>
          <r>irg<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rgaim</l>
          <r>irg<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rgaimis</l>
          <r>irg<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irg</l>
          <r>irg<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rgaigí</l>
          <r>irg<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rgadh</l>
          <r>irg<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rgaidís</l>
          <r>irg<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rgadh</l>
          <r>irg<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irg</l>
          <r>irg<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rgamar</l>
          <r>irg<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irg</l>
          <r>irg<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irg</l>
          <r>irg<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irg</l>
          <r>irg<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rgadar</l>
          <r>irg<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rgtaí</l>
          <r>irg<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rgainn</l>
          <r>irg<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rgaimis</l>
          <r>irg<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rgtá</l>
          <r>irg<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rgadh</l>
          <r>irg<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rgadh</l>
          <r>irg<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rgaidís</l>
          <r>irg<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irgthe</l>
          <r>irg<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irgthe</l>
          <r>irg<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irgthe</l>
          <r>irg<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irgthe</l>
          <r>irg<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rgtar</l>
          <r>irg<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rgaim</l>
          <r>irg<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rgaimid</l>
          <r>irg<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rgann</l>
          <r>irg<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rgann</l>
          <r>irg<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rgann</l>
          <r>irg<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rgann</l>
          <r>irg<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rga</l>
          <r>irg<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rgaimid</l>
          <r>irg<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rga</l>
          <r>irg<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rga</l>
          <r>irg<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rga</l>
          <r>irg<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rga</l>
          <r>irg<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="picé/ad__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>id</l>
          <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ad</l>
          <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ad</l>
          <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>id</l>
          <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="gimléad"><par n="initial-g"/><i>imlé</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="cróicéad"><par n="initial-c"/><i>róicé</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="teasairg"><par n="initial-t"/><i>easa</i><par n="teasa/irg__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="billéad"><par n="initial-b"/><i>illé</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="caiséad"><par n="initial-c"/><i>aisé</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="paimfléad"><par n="initial-p"/><i>aimflé</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="picéad"><par n="initial-p"/><i>icé</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="raicéad"><i>raicé</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="castainéad"><par n="initial-c"/><i>astainé</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="cairéad"><par n="initial-c"/><i>airé</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="coirbhéad"><par n="initial-c"/><i>oirbhé</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="oigiséad"><par n="initial-o"/><i>igisé</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="fínéigréad"><par n="initial-f"/><i>ínéigré</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="stroimpiléad"><i>stroimpilé</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="milléad"><par n="initial-m"/><i>illé</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="toirpéad"><par n="initial-t"/><i>oirpé</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="bairéad"><par n="initial-b"/><i>airé</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="gainéad"><par n="initial-g"/><i>ainé</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="nóiméad"><i>nóimé</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="sailéad"><par n="initial-s"/><i>ailé</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="caibinéad"><par n="initial-c"/><i>aibiné</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="gaiscéad"><par n="initial-g"/><i>aiscé</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="gairéad"><par n="initial-g"/><i>airé</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="graiféad"><par n="initial-g"/><i>raifé</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="dréachtbhuiséad"><par n="initial-d"/><i>réachtbhuisé</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="soicéad"><par n="initial-s"/><i>oicé</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ticéad"><par n="initial-t"/><i>icé</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="fuipéad"><par n="initial-f"/><i>uipé</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="troimpéad"><par n="initial-t"/><i>roimpé</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="aigéad"><par n="initial-a"/><i>igé</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="buicéad"><par n="initial-b"/><i>uicé</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="leictreamaighnéad"><i>leictreamaighné</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ceathairéad"><par n="initial-c"/><i>eathairé</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="pláinéad"><par n="initial-p"/><i>láiné</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="frigéad"><par n="initial-f"/><i>rigé</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="maighnéad"><par n="initial-m"/><i>aighné</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="clóiséad"><par n="initial-c"/><i>lóisé</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="físchaiséad"><par n="initial-f"/><i>íschaisé</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="paicéad"><par n="initial-p"/><i>aicé</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="fáiméad"><par n="initial-f"/><i>áimé</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="cráisiléad"><par n="initial-c"/><i>ráisilé</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="cóiméad"><par n="initial-c"/><i>óimé</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="blaincéad"><par n="initial-b"/><i>laincé</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="buiséad"><par n="initial-b"/><i>uisé</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="puipéad"><par n="initial-p"/><i>uipé</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="cruibhéad"><par n="initial-c"/><i>ruibhé</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="táibléad"><par n="initial-t"/><i>áiblé</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="tríréad"><par n="initial-t"/><i>ríré</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="loicéad"><i>loicé</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="clipéad"><par n="initial-c"/><i>lipé</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="lipéad"><i>lipé</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="firéad"><par n="initial-f"/><i>iré</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="seaicéad"><par n="initial-s"/><i>eaicé</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="soinéad"><par n="initial-s"/><i>oiné</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="mionphláinéad"><par n="initial-m"/><i>ionphláiné</i><par n="picé/ad__n_m"/></e>
